New York, session 2025-2026, S10595.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 8 of section 9 of chapter 401 of the laws of 2 2002, amending the real property tax law and the Nassau county adminis- 3 trative code relating to assessment and review of assessments in the 4 county of Nassau, as amended by chapter 136 of the laws of 2024, is 5 amended to read as follows: 6 8. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this act, on June 30, 7 [2026] 2028, the amendments of sections 6-2.1 and 6-13.0 of the Nassau 8 county administrative code, made by sections two and four of this act, 9 and section 6-24.1 of such code, as added by section seven of this act, 10 shall be deemed repealed. On such date the addition of the words "the 11 year following" to the first sentence of subdivision 8 of section 523-b 12 of the real property tax law, as amended by section one of this act, 13 shall be deemed repealed. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD16012-01-6